Utah statutes.
38-6-3.   Recording of certificate of discharge.

When a certificate of discharge of any federal lien issued by the proper officer is recorded in the office of the county recorder where the notice of lien is recorded, the recorder shall enter the certificate of discharge with date of recording in the federal lien index or grantor and grantee index and return the original document to the person recording.  If the lien, when recorded, contained a legal description of real property, the recorder shall require that the certificate of discharge contain the legal description.  The recorder shall index the certificate of discharge to that property.

